Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.155

Applicants and licensees—Bribes to public officials, employees, agents—Penalty.

(1) No applicant or licensee shall give or provide, or offer to give or provide, directly or indirectly, to any public official or employee or agent of this state, or any of its agencies or political subdivisions, any compensation or reward, or share of the money or property paid or received through gambling activities, in consideration for obtaining any license, authorization, permission or privilege to participate in any gaming operations except as authorized by this chapter or rules adopted pursuant thereto.

(2) Violation of this section is a class C felony for which a person, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than five years or a fine of not more than one hundred thousand dollars, or both.

[ 2003 c 53 s 34; 1981 c 139 s 15.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Severability—1981 c 139: See note following RCW 9.46.070.